Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201649-14,123
Commission;
duties.

In addition to any other duties prescribed
by law, the commission shall:

(1) Adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act;

(2) Prescribe forms for statements and reports required to
be filed pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act and furnish such forms to persons required to file such
statements and reports;

(3) Prepare and publish one or more manuals explaining the
duties of all persons and other entities required to file statements and reports
by the act and setting forth recommended
uniform methods of accounting and reporting for such filings;

(4) Accept and file any reasonable amount of information
voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of the act;

(5) Make statements and reports filed with the commission
available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours and
make copying facilities available at a cost of not more than fifty cents per
page;

(6) Compile and maintain an index of all reports and statements
filed with the commission to facilitate public access to such reports and
statements;

(7) Prepare and publish summaries of statements and reports
filed with the commission and special reports and technical studies to further
the purposes of the act;

(8) Review all statements and reports filed with the commission
in order to ascertain whether any person has failed to file a required statement
or has filed a deficient statement;

(9) Preserve statements and reports filed with the commission
for a period of not less than five years from the date of receipt;

(10) Issue and publish advisory opinions on the requirements
of the act upon the request of a
person or government body directly covered or affected by the act. Any
such opinion rendered by the commission, until amended or revoked, shall be
binding on the commission in any subsequent charges concerning the person
or government body who requested the opinion and who acted in reliance on
it in good faith unless material facts were omitted or misstated by the person
or government body in the request for the opinion;

(11) Act as the primary civil enforcement agency for violations
of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act and the rules
or regulations adopted and promulgated
thereunder;

(12) Receive all late filing fees, civil penalties, and interest
imposed pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act and remit all such
funds to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission Cash
Fund; and

(13) Prepare and distribute to the appropriate local officials
statements of financial interest, campaign committee organization forms, filing
instructions and forms, and such other forms as the commission may deem appropriate.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 123;

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 9;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 13;

Laws 1983, LB 479, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 556, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 14;

Laws 1997, LB 420, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 758, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 438, § 10;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 56;

Laws 2007, LB464, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB79, § 27.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

The Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission is required to prescribe forms for statements and reports that are required to be filed under both the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act and the Campaign Finance Limitation Act and furnish such forms to persons required to file such statements and reports, as well as to distribute these forms to the appropriate local officials. Nebraska Legislature on behalf of State v. Hergert, 271 Neb. 976, 720 N.W.2d 372 (2006).